Washington statutes.
RCW 3.02.050

Discovery rules in civil cases.

By January 1, 1982, the supreme court shall adopt rules providing for discovery in civil cases in the courts of limited jurisdiction.

[ 1981 c 331 s 8.]

NOTES:

Court Congestion Reduction Act of 1981—Purpose—Severability—1981 c 331: See notes following RCW 2.32.070.